bg_CS.dic
ꙗгода/Z0S5	po:noun
ꙗзва/Z0S5	po:noun
авва/Z0S5	po:noun
агода/Z0S5	po:noun
апостолъ/G0S3
багъръ/G0	po:noun
богъ/G1S3	po:noun
бой/G3	po:noun
братръ/G0S3	po:noun
братъ/G0S3	po:noun
бритва/Z0S5	po:noun
бъчела/Z0S5	po:noun
бьчела/Z0S5	po:noun
бѣсъ/G0S3	po:noun
вꙑꙗ/Z3	po:noun
вꙑсота/Z0S5	po:noun
варъ/G0S3	po:noun
вельбѫдъ/G0S3	po:noun
верига/Z0S5	po:noun
винарь/G2S4	po:noun
владꙑка/Z1S5	po:noun
владꙑчица/Z1S5	po:noun
властелинъ/G0	po:noun
влъкъ/G1S3	po:noun
вода/Z0S5	po:noun
водоносъ/G0	po:noun
вождь/G2S4	po:noun
возъ/G0S3	po:noun
воиска/Z0S5	po:noun
воскъ/G0	po:noun
врабий/G3S4	po:noun
врагъ/G1S3	po:noun
вранъ/G0S3	po:noun
врачь/G4S4	po:noun
врачьба/Z0S5	po:noun
врьбьница/Z1	po:noun
врьста/Z0S5	po:noun
възглавьница/Z0S5	po:noun
въѥевода/Z0S5	po:noun
вьдова/Z0S5	po:noun
вѣра/Z0S5	po:noun
вѣсъ/G0S3	po:noun
гвоздьи/G3	po:noun
глава/Z0S5	po:noun
гладъ/G0S3	po:noun
гласъ/G0S3	po:noun
горьница/Z1S5	po:noun
горѧщина/Z0S5	po:noun
господарь/G2	po:noun
градъ/G0S3	po:noun
гражданинъ/G0	po:noun
грива/Z0S5	po:noun
гръмъ/G0S3	po:noun
грѣхъ/G1S3	po:noun
грѣшникъ/G1S3	po:noun
даръ/G0S3	po:noun
десница/Z1S5	po:noun
другъ/G1	po:noun
дрьжава/Z0S5	po:noun
дрѧзга/Z1S5	po:noun
духъ/G0S3	po:noun
душа/Z3	po:noun
дъска/Z1S5	po:noun
дѣва/Z0S5	po:noun
дѣлатель/G2S4	po:noun
дѣтищть/G2S4	po:noun
дѫбрава/Z0S5	po:noun
елень/G2S4	po:noun
жаба/Z0S5	po:noun
желѣтва/Z0S5	po:noun
жена/Z0S5	po:noun
женима/Z0S5	po:noun
женитва/Z0S5	po:noun
животъ/G0	po:noun
жила/Z0S5	po:noun
жладьба/Z0S5	po:noun
жрьтва/Z0S5	po:noun
жрьтвьникъ/G0S3	po:noun
жѧжда/Z3	po:noun
жѧтва/Z0S5	po:noun
завой/G3	po:noun
землянинъ/G0	po:noun
злато/S0S3	po:noun
зной/G3	po:noun
зълодѣй/G3	po:noun
зѫбъ/G0S3	po:noun
иний/G3	po:noun
камꙑкъ/G0	po:noun
камара/Z0S5	po:noun
клевета/Z0S5	po:noun
клопотъ/G0	po:noun
кожа/Z1S5	po:noun
конь/G2S4	po:noun
корабль/G2S4	po:noun
кошь/G4S4	po:noun
край/G3	po:noun
крьстянинъ/G0	po:noun
кумирь/G2S4	po:noun
купьць/G2S4	po:noun
кънѧꙃь/G4S4	po:noun
кънѧзь/G4S4	po:noun
лакътъ/G0	po:noun
ласка/Z0S5	po:noun
лицемѣръ/G0	po:noun
ловьць/G2S4	po:noun
лъжа/Z1S5	po:noun
лѣпота/Z0S5	po:noun
межда/Z1S5	po:noun
междина/Z0S5	po:noun
миръ/G0S3	po:noun
млъва/Z0S5	po:noun
мой/G3ZP
молитва/Z0S5	po:noun
мрѣжа/Z1S5	po:noun
муха/Z1S5
мытарь/G2S4	po:noun
мѫжь/G4S4	po:noun
мѫка/Z1S5	po:noun
нагъ/G1	po:noun
нива/Z0S5	po:noun
нищета/Z0S5	po:noun
нога/Z1S5	po:noun
ножь/G2S4	po:noun
нужда/Z1S5	po:noun
образъ/G0S3
овьца/Z4S5	po:noun
ограда/Z0S5	po:noun
отрокъ/G1S3
отьць/G4S4	po:noun
оцьтъ/G0S3	po:noun
пара/Z0S5	po:noun
пастꙑрь/G2S4	po:noun
паства/Z0S5	po:noun
пасха/Z0S5	po:noun
патриархъ/G1	po:noun
пашеногъ/G0	po:noun
пещера/Z0S5	po:noun
пила/Z0S5	po:noun
пира/Z0S5	po:noun
пискъ/G0S3	po:noun
пища/Z1S5	po:noun
плачь/G2S4	po:noun
плодъ/G0S3
плѣва/Z0S5	po:noun
погребитель/G2S4	po:noun
позоръ/G0S3	po:noun
поимъ/G0S3	po:noun
покровъ/G0S3	po:noun
пола/Z0S5	po:noun
польꙃа/Z1S5	po:noun
польза/Z0S5	po:noun
понꙗва/Z0S5	po:noun
поставъ/G0S3	po:noun
притъча/Z1S5	po:noun
приятель/G2S4	po:noun
пророчица/Z1S5	po:noun
пътищь/G2S4	po:noun
пѣнѧзь/G2S4	po:noun
рꙑба/Z0S5	po:noun
рꙑсъ/G0	po:noun
рабъ/G0S3	po:noun
рана/Z0S5	po:noun
ризьница/Z1S5	po:noun
родъ/G0S3	po:noun
роса/Z0S5	po:noun
руда/Z0S5	po:noun
ръдръ/G0	po:noun
ръжда/Z0S5	po:noun
ръпътъ/G0	po:noun
рътъ/G0	po:noun
рыбарь/G2S4	po:noun
рѣдокъ/G0	po:noun
рѣка/Z1S5	po:noun
рѫка/Z1S5	po:noun
садъ/G0S3	po:noun
сватьба/Z0S5	po:noun
седьмица/Z1	po:noun
сестра/Z0S5	po:noun
сила/Z0S5	po:noun
сито/S0S3	po:noun
сковрада/Z0S5	po:noun
скотъ/G0S3	po:noun
скрада/Z0S5	po:noun
слава/Z0S5	po:noun
словѣнинъ/G0	po:noun
слуга/Z1S5	po:noun
снѣгъ/G0	po:noun
стража/Z1S5	po:noun
стражь/G4	po:noun
стрѣла/Z0S5	po:noun
стьза/Z1S5	po:noun
съборъ/G0S3	po:noun
съвѣдѣтель/G2S4	po:noun
съпаства/Z0S5	po:noun
сѫдъ/G0S3	po:noun
таиба/Z0S5	po:noun
тай/G3	po:noun
трепетъ/G0	po:noun
тьмьница/Z1S5	po:noun
тѧжатель/G2S4	po:noun
учитель/G2S4	po:noun
хвала/Z0S5	po:noun
ходотай/G3	po:noun
царь/G2S4	po:noun
чабьръ/G0S3	po:noun
чаша/Z3	po:noun
чрѣвий/G3S4	po:noun
чьловѣкъ/G1S3	po:noun
шьпътъ/G0S3	po:noun
ѧзꙑкъ/G1S4	po:noun
ѧзꙑчьникъ/G1S3	po:noun
ѧчьмикъ/G1	po:noun
ѩꙃа/Z1S5	po:noun
ѫгълъ/G0	po:noun
ѫда/Z0	po:noun
брѣгъ/G0S3	po:noun
вѣтръ/G0S3	po:noun
